Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-605
State Treasurer; records; inspection
by Legislature; audit.

All the books, papers, letters, and transactions pertaining
to the office of State Treasurer shall be open to the inspection of a committee
of the Legislature to examine and settle all accounts and to count all money. When the successor of any such treasurer shall be elected
and qualified, the Auditor of Public Accounts shall examine and settle all
accounts of such treasurer remaining unsettled and give him or her a certified statement showing the balance
of money, securities, and
effects for which he or she is
accountable, and which have been delivered to his or her successor, and report the balance electronically to the Legislature.

R.S.1866, c. 4, § 19, p. 26;

R.S.1913, § 5580;

C.S.1922, § 4884;

C.S.1929, § 84-605;

R.S.1943, § 84-605;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 225.